New Jersey, session 222, A1993.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  N.J.S.2C:35-14 is amended to read as follows: 2C:35-14. Rehabilitation Program for Persons with a Substance Use Disorder Subject to a Presumption of Incarceration or a Mandatory Minimum Period of Parole Ineligibility; Criteria for Imposing Special Probation; Ineligible Offenders; Commitment to Residential Treatment Facilities or Participation in a Nonresidential Treatment Program; Presumption of Revocation; Brief Incarceration in Lieu of Permanent Revocation. a.    Any person who is ineligible for probation due to a conviction for a crime which is subject to a presumption of incarceration or a mandatory minimum period of parole ineligibility may be sentenced to a term of special probation in accordance with this section, and may not apply for treatment for substance use disorder pursuant to N.J.S.2C:45-1.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person who is eligible for probation in accordance with N.J.S.2C:45-1 due to a conviction for an offense which is not subject to a presumption of incarceration or a mandatory minimum period of parole ineligibility from applying for treatment for substance use disorder as a condition of probation pursuant to N.J.S.2C:45-1; provided, however, that a person in need of treatment as defined in subsection f. of section 2 of P.L.2012, c.23 (C.2C:35-14.2) shall be sentenced in accordance with that section.  Notwithstanding the presumption of incarceration pursuant to the provisions of subsection d. of N.J.S.2C:44-1, whenever a person with a substance use disorder who is subject to sentencing under this section is convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for an offense, other than one described in subsection b. of this section, the court, upon notice to the prosecutor, may, on motion of the person, or on the courts own motion, place the person on special probation, which shall be for a term of five years, provided that the court finds on the record that: (1)  the person has undergone a professional diagnostic assessment to determine whether and to what extent the person has a substance use disorder and would benefit from treatment; and (2)  the person has a substance use disorder within the meaning of N.J.S.2C:35-2 and was with a substance use disorder at the time of the commission of the present offense; and (3)  the present offense was committed while the person was under the influence of a controlled dangerous substance, controlled substance analog or alcohol or was committed to acquire property or monies in order to support the person's substance use disorder; and (4)  substance use  disorder treatment and monitoring will serve to benefit the person by addressing the persons substance use disorder and will thereby reduce the likelihood that the person will thereafter commit another offense; and (5)  the person did not possess a firearm at the time of the present offense and did not possess a firearm at the time of any pending criminal charge; and (6)  the person has not been previously convicted on two or more separate occasions of crimes of the first or second degree, other than those listed in paragraph (7); or the person has not been previously convicted on two or more separate occasions, where one of the offenses is a crime of the third degree, other than crimes defined in N.J.S.2C:35-10, and one of the offenses is a crime of the first or second degree; and (7)  the person has not been previously convicted or adjudicated delinquent for, and does not have a pending charge of murder, aggravated manslaughter, manslaughter, kidnapping, aggravated assault, aggravated sexual assault or sexual assault, or a similar crime under the laws of any other state or the United States; and (8)  a suitable treatment facility licensed and approved by the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services in the Department of Human Services is able and has agreed to provide appropriate treatment services in accordance with the requirements of this section; and (9)  no danger to the community will result from the person being placed on special probation pursuant to this section. In determining whether to sentence the person pursuant to this section, the court shall consider all relevant circumstances, and shall take judicial notice of any evidence, testimony or information adduced at the trial, plea hearing or other court proceedings, and shall also consider the presentence report and the results of the professional diagnostic assessment to determine whether and to what extent the person has a substance use disorder and would benefit from treatment.  The court shall give priority to a person who has moved to be sentenced to special probation over a person who is being considered for a sentence to special probation on the courts own motion or in accordance with the provisions of section 2 of P.L.2012, c.23 (C.2C:35-14.2). As a condition of special probation, the court shall order the person to enter a residential treatment program at a facility licensed and approved by the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services in the Department of Human Services or a program of nonresidential treatment by a licensed and approved treatment provider, which program may include the use of medication-assisted treatment as defined in paragraph (7) of subsection f. of this section, to comply with program rules and the requirements of the course of treatment, to cooperate fully with the treatment provider, and to comply with such other reasonable terms and conditions as may be required by the court or by law, pursuant to N.J.S.2C:45-1, and which shall include periodic urine testing for drug or alcohol usage throughout the period of special probation.  In determining whether to order the person to participate in a nonresidential rather than a residential treatment program, the court shall follow the procedure set forth in subsection j. of this section.  Subject to the requirements of subsection d. of this section, the conditions of special probation may include different methods and levels of community-based or residential supervision. b.    A person shall not be eligible for special probation pursuant to this section if the person is convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for: (1)  a crime of the first degree; (2)  a crime of the first or second degree enumerated in subsection d. of section 2 of P.L.1997, c.117 (C.2C:43-7.2), other than a crime of the second degree involving N.J.S.2C:15-1 (robbery) or N.J.S.2C:18-2 (burglary); (3)  a crime, other than that defined in section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7), for which a mandatory minimum period of incarceration is prescribed under chapter 35 of this Title or any other law; or (4)  an offense that involved the distribution or the conspiracy or attempt to distribute a controlled dangerous substance or controlled substance analog to a juvenile near or on school property. c.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2012, c.23) d.    Except as otherwise provided in subsection j. of this section, a person convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for a crime of the second degree or of a violation of section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7), or who previously has been convicted of or adjudicated delinquent for an offense under subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-5 or a similar offense under any other law of this State, any other state or the United States, who is placed on special probation under this section shall be committed to the custody of a residential substance use  disorder treatment facility licensed and approved by the Division of Mental Health and Addiction Services in the Department of Human Services.  Subject to the authority of the court to temporarily suspend imposition of all or any portion of the term of commitment to a residential treatment facility pursuant to subsection j. of this section, the person shall be committed to the residential treatment facility immediately, unless the facility cannot accommodate the person, in which case the person shall be incarcerated to await commitment to the residential treatment facility.  The term of such commitment shall be for a minimum of six months, or until the court, upon recommendation of the treatment provider, determines that the person has successfully completed the residential treatment program, whichever is later, except that no person shall remain in the custody of a residential treatment facility pursuant to this section for a period in excess of five years.  Upon successful completion of the required residential treatment program, the person shall complete the period of special probation, as authorized by subsection a. of this section, with credit for time served for any imprisonment served as a condition of probation and credit for each day during which the person satisfactorily complied with the terms and conditions of special probation while committed pursuant to this section to a residential treatment facility.  Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (1) of subsection l. of this section, the person shall not be eligible for early discharge of special probation pursuant to N.J.S.2C:45-2, or any other provision of the law.  The court, in determining the number of credits for time spent in residential treatment, shall consider the recommendations of the treatment provider.  A person placed into a residential treatment facility pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be subject to official detention for the purposes of N.J.S.2C:29-5 (escape). e.    The probation department or other appropriate agency designated by the court to monitor or supervise the persons special probation shall report periodically to the court as to the persons progress in treatment and compliance with court-imposed terms and conditions.  The treatment provider shall promptly report to the probation department or other appropriate agency all significant failures by the person to comply with any court-imposed term or condition of special probation or any requirements of the course of treatment, including but not limited to a positive drug or alcohol test, which shall only constitute a violation for a person using medication-assisted treatment as defined in paragraph (7) of subsection f. of this section if the positive test is unrelated to the persons medication-assisted treatment, or the unexcused failure to attend any session or activity, and shall immediately report any act that would constitute an escape.  The probation department or other appropriate agency shall immediately notify the court and the prosecutor in the event that the person refuses to submit to a periodic drug or alcohol test or for any reason terminates the person's participation in the course of treatment, or commits any act that would constitute an escape. f. (1) Upon a first violation of any term or condition of the special probation authorized by this section or of any requirements of the course of treatment, the court in its discretion may permanently revoke the persons special probation. (2)  Upon a second or subsequent violation of any term or condition of the special probation authorized by this section or of any requirements of the course of treatment, the court shall, subject only to the provisions of subsection g. of this section, permanently revoke the persons special probation unless the court finds on the record that there is a substantial likelihood that the person will successfully complete the treatment program if permitted to continue on special probation, and the court is clearly convinced, considering the nature and seriousness of the violations, that no danger to the community will result from permitting the person to continue on special probation pursuant to this section.  The courts determination to permit the person to continue on special probation following a second or subsequent violation pursuant to this paragraph may be appealed by the prosecution. (3)  In making its determination whether to revoke special probation, and whether to overcome the presumption of revocation established in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the court shall consider the nature and seriousness of the present infraction and any past infractions in relation to the persons overall progress in the course of treatment, and shall also consider the recommendations of the treatment provider.  The court shall give added weight to the treatment providers recommendation that the persons special probation be permanently revoked, or to the treatment providers opinion that the person is not amenable to treatment or is not likely to complete the treatment program successfully. (4)  If the court permanently revokes the persons special probation pursuant to this subsection, the court shall impose any sentence that might have been imposed, or that would have been required to be imposed, originally for the offense for which the person was convicted or adjudicated delinquent.  The court shall conduct a de novo review of any aggravating and mitigating factors present at the time of both original sentencing and resentencing.  If the court determines or is required pursuant to any other provision of this chapter or any other law to impose a term of imprisonment, the person shall receive credit for any time served in custody pursuant to N.J.S.2C:45-1 or while awaiting placement in a treatment facility pursuant to this section, and for each day during which the person satisfactorily complied with the terms and conditions of special probation while committed pursuant to this section to a residential treatment facility. The court, in determining the number of credits for time spent in a residential treatment facility, shall consider the recommendations of the treatment provider. (5)  Following a violation, if the court permits the person to continue on special probation pursuant to this section, the court shall order the person to comply with such additional terms and conditions, including but not limited to more frequent drug or alcohol testing, as are necessary to deter and promptly detect any further violation. (6)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, if the person at any time refuses to undergo urine testing for drug or alcohol usage as provided in subsection a. of this section, the court shall, subject only to the provisions of subsection g. of this section, permanently revoke the persons special probation. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the person at any time while committed to the custody of a residential treatment facility pursuant to this section commits an act that would constitute an escape, the court shall forthwith permanently revoke the persons special probation. (7)  An action for a violation under this section may be brought by a probation officer or prosecutor or on the courts own motion.  Failure to complete successfully the required treatment program shall constitute a violation of the persons special probation.  In the case of the temporary or continued management of a persons substance use disorder by means of medication-assisted treatment as defined herein, whenever supported by a report from the treatment provider of existing satisfactory progress and reasonably predictable long-term success with or without further medication-assisted treatment, the persons use of the medication-assisted treatment, even if continuing, shall not be the basis to constitute a failure to complete successfully the treatment program.  A person who fails to comply with the terms of the persons special probation pursuant to this section and is thereafter sentenced to imprisonment in accordance with this subsection shall thereafter be ineligible for entry into the Intensive Supervision Program, provided however that this provision shall not affect the persons eligibility for entry into the Intensive Supervision Program for a subsequent conviction. As used in this section, the term medication-assisted treatment means the use of any medications approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration to treat substance use disorders, including extended-release naltrexone, methadone, and buprenorphine, in combination with counseling and behavioral therapies, to provide a whole-patient approach to the treatment of substance use disorders. g.    When a person on special probation is subject to a presumption of revocation on a second or subsequent violation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection f. of this section, or when the person refuses to undergo drug or alcohol testing pursuant to paragraph (6) of subsection f. of this section, the court may, in lieu of permanently revoking the persons special probation, impose a term of incarceration for a period of not less than 30 days nor more than six months, after which the persons term of special probation pursuant to this section may be reinstated. In determining whether to order a period of incarceration in lieu of permanent revocation pursuant to this subsection, the court shall consider the recommendations of the treatment provider with respect to the likelihood that such confinement would serve to motivate the person to make satisfactory progress in treatment once special probation is reinstated.  This disposition may occur only once with respect to any person unless the court is clearly convinced that there are compelling and extraordinary reasons to justify reimposing this disposition with respect to the person.  Any such determination by the court to reimpose this disposition may be appealed by the prosecution.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of the court at any time during the period of special probation to order a person on special probation who is not subject to a presumption of revocation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection f. of this section to be incarcerated over the course of a weekend, or for any other reasonable period of time, when the court in its discretion determines that such incarceration would help to motivate the person to make satisfactory progress in treatment. h.    The court, as a condition of its order, and after considering the persons financial resources, shall require the person to pay that portion of the costs associated with the persons participation in any residential or nonresidential treatment program imposed pursuant to this section which, in the opinion of the court, is consistent with the persons ability to pay, taking into account the courts authority to order payment or reimbursement to be made over time and in installments. i.     The court shall impose, as a condition of the special probation, any fine, penalty, fee or restitution applicable to the offense for which the person was convicted or adjudicated delinquent. j.     Where the court finds that a person has satisfied all of the eligibility criteria for special probation and would otherwise be required to be committed to the custody of a residential substance use disorders treatment facility pursuant to the provisions of subsection d. of this section, the court may temporarily suspend imposition of all or any portion of the term of commitment to a residential treatment facility and may instead order the person to enter a nonresidential treatment program, provided that the court finds on the record that: (1)  the person conducting the diagnostic assessment required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection a. of this section has recommended in writing that the proposed course of nonresidential treatment services is clinically appropriate and adequate to address the persons treatment needs; and (2)  no danger to the community would result from the person participating in the proposed course of nonresidential treatment services; and (3)  a suitable treatment provider is able and has agreed to provide clinically appropriate nonresidential treatment services. If the prosecutor objects to the courts decision to suspend the commitment of the person to a residential treatment facility pursuant to this subsection, the sentence of special probation imposed pursuant to this section shall not become final for 10 days in order to permit the appeal by the prosecution of the courts decision. After a period of six months of nonresidential treatment, if the court, considering all available information including but not limited to the recommendation of the treatment provider, finds that the person has made satisfactory progress in treatment and that there is a substantial likelihood that the person will successfully complete the nonresidential treatment program and period of special probation, the court, on notice to the prosecutor, may permanently suspend the commitment of the person to the custody of a residential treatment program, in which event the special monitoring provisions set forth in subsection k. of this section shall no longer apply. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of the court at any time during the term of special probation to order the person to be committed to a residential or nonresidential treatment facility if the court determines that such treatment is clinically appropriate and necessary to address the persons present treatment needs. k. (1) When the court temporarily suspends the commitment of the person to a residential treatment facility pursuant to subsection j. of this section, the court shall, in addition to ordering participation in a prescribed course of nonresidential treatment and any other appropriate terms or conditions authorized or required by law, order the person to undergo urine testing for drug or alcohol use not less than once per week unless otherwise ordered by the court.  The court-ordered testing shall be conducted by the probation department or the treatment provider.  The results of all tests shall be reported promptly to the court and to the prosecutor.  If the person is involved with a program that is providing the person medication-assisted treatment as defined in paragraph (7) of subsection f. of this section, only a positive urine test for drug or alcohol use unrelated to the medication-assisted treatment shall constitute a violation of the terms and conditions of special probation.  In addition, the court shall impose appropriate curfews or other restrictions on the persons movements, and may order the person to wear electronic monitoring devices to enforce such curfews or other restrictions as a condition of special probation. (2)  The probation department or other appropriate agency shall immediately notify the court and the prosecutor in the event that the person fails or refuses to submit to a drug or alcohol test, knowingly defrauds the administration of a drug or alcohol test, terminates the persons participation in the course of treatment, or commits any act that would constitute absconding from parole.  If the person at any time while entered in a nonresidential treatment program pursuant to subsection j. of this section knowingly defrauds the administration of a drug or alcohol test, goes into hiding, or leaves the State with a purpose of avoiding supervision, the court shall permanently revoke the persons special probation. l.     (1) If the court finds that the person has made exemplary progress in the course of treatment, the court may, upon recommendation of the persons supervising probation officer or on the courts own motion, and upon notice to the prosecutor, grant early discharge from a term of special probation provided that the person: (1) has satisfactorily completed the treatment program ordered by the court; (2) has served at least two years of special probation; (3) within the preceding 12 months, did not commit a substantial violation of any term or condition of special probation, including but not limited to a positive urine test, which shall only constitute a violation for a person using medication-assisted treatment as defined in paragraph (7) of subsection f. of this section if the positive test is unrelated to the persons medication-assisted treatment; and (4) is not likely to relapse or commit an offense if probation supervision and related services are discontinued. (2) Notwithstanding the five-year term of special probation set forth in subsection a. of this section, the person may, upon motion and with notice to the prosecutor, seek to extend the term of special probation for up to 12 months for the purposes of disposing of any pending charges for an offense allegedly committed during the persons term of special probation or to maintain eligibility for an expungement pursuant to subsection m. of this section.  The court shall have discretion to continue or modify any terms or conditions of special probation during this additional term. m. (1) The Superior Court may order the expungement of all records and information relating to all prior arrests, detentions, convictions, adjudications of juvenile delinquency, and proceedings for any offense enumerated in [Title 2C of] the New Jersey Statutes, the Revised Statutes, or any municipal or county ordinance upon successful discharge from a term of special probation as provided in this section, regardless of whether the person was sentenced to special probation under this section, section 2 of P.L.2012, c.23 (C.2C:35-14.2), or N.J.S.2C:45-1, if the person satisfactorily completed a substance use disorder treatment program as ordered by the court [and was not convicted of any crime, or adjudged a disorderly person or petty disorderly person, during the term of special probation]. The provisions of N.J.S.2C:52-7 through N.J.S.2C:52-14 shall not apply to an expungement pursuant to this paragraph and no fee shall be charged to a person eligible for relief pursuant to this paragraph.  The court shall grant the relief requested unless it finds that the need for the availability of the records outweighs the desirability of having the person freed from any disabilities associated with their availability, or it finds that the person is otherwise ineligible for expungement pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection.  An expungement under this paragraph shall proceed in accordance with rules and procedures developed by the Supreme Court. (2)  A person shall not be eligible [for expungement] to expunge under paragraph (1) of this subsection [if the records include] a conviction for any [offense] crime barred from expungement pursuant to subsection b. or c. of N.J.S.2C:52-2, but shall be eligible to expunge any prior offenses that are not barred from expungement. No expungement shall be considered until any pending charges are disposed. It shall be the obligation of the prosecutor to notify the court of any disqualifying convictions or any other factors related to public safety that should be considered by the court when deciding to grant an expungement under paragraph (1) of this subsection. (3)  The Superior Court shall provide a copy of the expungement order granted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection to the prosecutor and to the person and, if the person was represented by the Public Defender, to the Public Defender.  The [person or, if the person was represented by the Public Defender, the Public Defender on behalf of the person,] court, pursuant to subsection c. of section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), shall promptly distribute copies of the expungement order to appropriate agencies who have custody and control of the records specified in the order so that the agencies may comply with the requirements of N.J.S.2C:52-15. (4)  If the person whose records are expunged pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection is convicted of any crime following discharge from special probation, the full record of arrests and convictions may be restored to public access and no future expungement shall be granted to such person. (5)  A person who, prior to the effective date of P.L.2015, c.261, was successfully discharged from a term of special probation as provided in this section, regardless of whether the person was sentenced to special probation under this section, section 2 of P.L.2012, c.23 (C.2C:35-14.2), or N.J.S.2C:45-1, may seek an expungement of all records and information relating to all arrests, detentions, convictions, adjudications of juvenile delinquency, and proceedings for any offense enumerated in [Title 2C of] the New Jersey Statutes, the Revised Statutes, or any municipal or county ordinance that existed at the time of discharge from special probation by presenting an application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person was sentenced to special probation, which contains a duly verified petition as provided in N.J.S.2C:52-7 for each crime or offense sought to be expunged.  The petition for expungement shall proceed pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-1 et seq. except that the requirements related to the expiration of the time periods specified in N.J.S.2C:52-2 through section 1 of P.L.1980, c.163 (C.2C:52-4.1) shall not apply.  [A person who was convicted of any offense barred from expungement pursuant to subsection b. or c. of N.J.S.2C:52-2, or who has been convicted of any crime or offense since the date of discharge from special probation shall not be eligible to apply for an expungement under this paragraph.]  A conviction for a crime which is not subject to expungement pursuant to subsection b. or c. of N.J.S.2C:52-2 shall not be expunged under this paragraph, but the person shall be eligible to expunge any other offenses that are not barred from expungement.  In addition, no application for expungement shall be considered until any pending charges are disposed.  It shall be the obligation of the prosecutor to notify the court of any disqualifying convictions or any other factors related to public safety that should be considered by the court when deciding to grant an expungement under this paragraph.  The Superior Court shall consider the persons verified petition and may order the expungement of all records and information relating to all arrests, detentions, convictions, and proceedings of the person that existed at the time of discharge from special probation as appropriate.  The court shall grant the relief requested unless it finds that the need for the availability of the records outweighs the desirability of having the person freed from any disabilities associated with their availability, or it finds that the person is otherwise ineligible for expungement pursuant to this paragraph.  No fee shall be charged to a person eligible for relief pursuant to this paragraph. (6) (a) A person who is not eligible for expungement relief pursuant to paragraph (1) or (5) of this subsection because of a conviction occurring prior to, on, or after the effective date of P.L.2021, c.460, for any offense set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:24-4, involving endangering the welfare of a child, which is barred from expungement pursuant to subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:52-2 and therefore renders the person ineligible under those paragraphs, may be eligible to seek expungement relief pursuant to this paragraph.  The person shall have been successfully discharged from a term of special probation as provided in this section, regardless of whether the person was sentenced to special probation under this section, section 2 of P.L.2012, c.23 (C.2C:35-14.2), or N.J.S.2C:45-1, for a period of at least 10 years prior to seeking an expungement of all records and information relating to all arrests, detentions, convictions, adjudications of juvenile delinquency, and proceedings for any offense enumerated in [Title 2C of] the New Jersey Statutes, the Revised Statutes, or any municipal or county ordinance that existed at the time of discharge from special probation. The person shall present an application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person was sentenced to special probation, which contains a duly verified petition as provided in N.J.S.2C:52-7 for each crime or offense sought to be expunged.  The petition for expungement shall proceed pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-1 et seq.  A person shall not be eligible to apply for an expungement under this paragraph if that person was convicted of any offense barred from expungement pursuant to subsection b. or c. of N.J.S.2C:52-2, other than a conviction for endangering the welfare of a child under paragraph (2) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:24-4, which crime is also determined by the court, based upon a review by the prosecutor in accordance with subparagraph (b) of this paragraph, to have been nonviolent with respect to the facts and elements of the criminal act, or if that person has been convicted of any crime or offense since the date of discharge from special probation.  In addition, no application for expungement shall be considered until any pending charges are disposed.  It shall be the obligation of the prosecutor to notify the court of any disqualifying convictions, any conviction for endangering the welfare of a child reviewed by the prosecutor and found to be violent, or any other factors related to public safety that should be considered by the court when deciding to grant an expungement under this paragraph.  The Superior Court shall consider the persons verified petition and may order the expungement of all records and information relating to all arrests, detentions, convictions, and proceedings of the person that existed at the time of discharge from special probation as appropriate.  The court shall grant the relief requested unless it finds that the need for the availability of the records outweighs the desirability of having the person freed from any disabilities associated with their availability, or it finds that the person is otherwise ineligible for expungement pursuant to this paragraph.  No fee shall be charged to a person eligible for relief pursuant to this paragraph. (b)  The prosecutor, when reviewing a conviction for endangering the welfare of a child under paragraph (2) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 as to whether the facts and elements of the criminal act were nonviolent and therefore do not prevent, as to this conviction, a persons eligibility for expungement relief under this paragraph, shall consider any act which falls under the following definitions to be violent acts, and render the person ineligible for expungement relief: any act of abuse, as defined in R.S.9:6-1, that is specifically listed in part (c) of the definition, employing or permitting a child to be employed in any occupation, employment or vocation dangerous to the morals of such child; part (e) of the definition, the performing of any indecent, immoral or unlawful act or deed, in the presence of a child, that may tend to debauch or endanger or degrade the morals of the child; part (f) of the definition, permitting or allowing any other person to perform any indecent, immoral or unlawful act in the presence of the child that may tend to debauch or endanger the morals of such child; or part (g) of the definition, using excessive physical restraint on the child under circumstances which do not indicate that the childs behavior is harmful to himself, others or property; any act of cruelty, as defined in R.S.9:6-1; and any act resulting in an abused or neglected child, as defined by subsection c. of section 1 of P.L.1974, c.119 (C.9:6-8.21), that is specifically listed in paragraph (1) of the definition, inflicting or allowing to be inflicted upon such child physical injury by other than accidental means which causes or creates a substantial risk of death, or serious or protracted disfigurement, or protracted impairment of physical or emotional health or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily organ; paragraph (2) of the definition, creating or allowing to be created a substantial or ongoing risk of physical injury to such child by other than accidental means which would be likely to cause death or serious or protracted disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily organ; paragraph (3) of the definition, committing or allowing to be committed an act of sexual abuse against the child; subparagraph (b) of paragraph (4) of the definition, solely as to a child whose physical, mental, or emotional condition has been impaired or is in imminent danger of becoming impaired as the result of the failure of the childs parent or guardian to exercise a minimum degree of care in providing the child with proper supervision or guardianship, by unreasonably inflicting or allowing to be inflicted excessive corporal punishment, or the substantial risk thereof; paragraph (6) of the definition, for a child upon whom excessive physical restraint has been used under circumstances which do not indicate that the childs behavior is harmful to himself, others, or property; or paragraph (7) of the definition, for a child who is in an institution and, pursuant to subparagraph (a) of that paragraph, has been placed there inappropriately for a continued period of time with the knowledge that the placement has resulted or may continue to result in harm to the childs mental or physical well-being or, pursuant to subparagraph (b) of that paragraph, who has been willfully isolated from ordinary social contact under circumstances which indicate emotional or social deprivation. (cf: P.L.2023, c.177, s.7) 2. N.J.S.2C:52-2 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-2.     Indictable Offenses. a.    In all cases, except as herein provided, a person may present an expungement application to the Superior Court pursuant to this section if: the person has been convicted of one crime under the laws of this State, and does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another crime [, whether within] under the laws of this State [or any other jurisdiction]. Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another crime shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the criminal conviction that is the subject of the application; or the person has been convicted of one crime and no more than three disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, and does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another crime under the laws of this State, or any subsequent conviction for another disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offense under the laws of this State such that the total number of convictions for disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses would exceed three [, whether any such crime or offense conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction]. Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the one criminal conviction and no more than three convictions for disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses that are the subject of the application; or the person has been convicted of multiple crimes or a combination of one or more crimes and one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, all of which are listed in a single judgment of conviction, and does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another crime or offense under the laws of this State in addition to those convictions included in the expungement application [, whether any such conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction].  Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense that is not listed in a single judgment of conviction shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions listed in a single judgment of conviction that are the subject of the application; or the person has been convicted of multiple crimes or a combination of one or more crimes and one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, which crimes or combination of crimes and offenses were interdependent or closely related in circumstances and were committed as part of a sequence of events that took place within a comparatively short period of time, regardless of the date of conviction or sentencing for each individual crime or offense, and the person does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another crime or offense under the laws of this State in addition to those convictions included in the expungement application [, whether any such conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction]. Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense that was not interdependent or closely related in circumstances and was not committed within a comparatively short period of time as described above shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions of crimes or crimes and offenses that were interdependent or closely related and committed within a comparatively short period of time, and that are the subject of the application. For purposes of determining eligibility to present an expungement application to the Superior Court pursuant to this section, a conviction for unlawful distribution of, or possessing or having under control with intent to distribute, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (11) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or a lesser amount of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of that section, or a violation of either of those paragraphs and a violation of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7) or subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1997, c.327 (C.2C:35-7.1), for distributing, or possessing or having under control with intent to distribute, on or within 1,000 feet of any school property, or on or within 500 feet of the real property comprising a public housing facility, public park, or public building, or for obtaining or possessing marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, [or for an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction,] regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction of a crime within this State [or any other jurisdiction] but shall instead be considered a conviction of a disorderly persons offense within this State [or an equivalent category of offense within the other jurisdiction], and a conviction for obtaining, possessing, using, being under the influence of, or failing to make lawful disposition of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (4) of subsection a., or subsection b., or subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or a violation involving marijuana or hashish as described herein and using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia with that marijuana or hashish in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-2, [or for an equivalent crime or offense in another jurisdiction,] regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction within this State [or any other jurisdiction]. The person, if eligible, may present the expungement application after the expiration of a period of five years from the date of [his] the persons most recent conviction, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later.  The term court-ordered financial assessment as used herein and throughout this section means and includes any fine, fee, penalty, restitution, and other form of financial assessment imposed by the court as part of the sentence for the conviction or convictions that are the subject of the application, for which payment of restitution takes precedence in accordance with chapter 46 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes.  The person shall submit the expungement application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions were adjudged, which includes a duly verified petition as provided in N.J.S.2C:52-7 praying that the conviction, or convictions if applicable, and all records and information pertaining thereto be expunged.  The petition appended to an application shall comply with the requirements set forth in N.J.S.2C:52-1 et seq. Notwithstanding the provisions concerning the five-year time requirement, if, at the time of application, a court-ordered financial assessment subject to collection under the comprehensive enforcement program established pursuant to P.L.1995, c.9 (C.2B:19-1 et al.) is not yet satisfied due to reasons other than willful noncompliance, but the time requirement of five years is otherwise satisfied, the person may submit the expungement application and the court may grant an expungement; provided, however, that if expungement is granted the court shall enter a civil judgment for the unpaid portion of the court-ordered financial assessment in the name of the Treasurer, State of New Jersey and transfer collections and disbursement responsibility to the State Treasurer for the outstanding amount in accordance with section 8 of P.L.2017, c.244 (C.2C:52-23.1).  The Treasurer may specify, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall collaborate with, the technical and informational standards required to effectuate the transfer of the collection and disbursement responsibilities.  Notwithstanding any provision in this law or any other law to the contrary, the court shall have sole discretion to amend the judgment. Additionally, an application may be filed and presented, and the court may grant an expungement pursuant to this section, although less than five years have expired in accordance with the time requirements when the court finds: (1)  the court-ordered financial assessment is satisfied but less than five years have expired from the date of satisfaction, the time requirement of five years is otherwise satisfied, and the court finds that the person substantially complied with any payment plan ordered pursuant to N.J.S.2C:46-1 et seq. or could not do so due to compelling circumstances affecting his ability to satisfy the assessment; or (2)  at least four but less than five years have expired from the date of the most recent conviction, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later; and the person has not been otherwise convicted of a crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense since the time of the most recent conviction; and the court finds in its discretion that compelling circumstances exist to grant the expungement. The prosecutor may object pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), N.J.S.2C:52-11, N.J.S.2C:52-14, or N.J.S.2C:52-24. In determining whether compelling circumstances exist for the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a court may consider any relevant information provided by the person submitting the application and the prosecutor, including the amount of any court-ordered financial assessment imposed, the persons age at the time of the offense or offenses, the persons financial condition, and other relevant circumstances regarding the persons ability to pay.  However, regarding a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection or a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to any other part of this section, the person shall not be required to provide transcripts of plea or sentencing proceedings or be required to provide any presentence reports with the application or any other filing. b.    Records of conviction pursuant to statutes repealed by this Code for the crimes of murder, manslaughter, treason, anarchy, kidnapping, rape, forcible sodomy, arson, perjury, false swearing, robbery, embracery, or a conspiracy or any attempt to commit any of the foregoing, or aiding, assisting or concealing persons accused of the foregoing crimes, shall not be expunged. Records of conviction for the following crimes specified in the New Jersey Code of Criminal Justice shall not be subject to expungement: N.J.S.2C:11-1 et seq. (Criminal Homicide), except death by auto as specified in N.J.S.2C:11-5 and strict liability vehicular homicide as specified in section 1 of P.L.2017, c.165 (C.2C:11-5.3); N.J.S.2C:13-1 (Kidnapping); section 1 of P.L.1993, c.291 (C.2C:13-6) (Luring or Enticing); section 1 of P.L.2005, c.77 (C.2C:13-8) (Human Trafficking); N.J.S.2C:14-2 (Sexual Assault or Aggravated Sexual Assault); subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:14-3 (Aggravated Criminal Sexual Contact); if the victim is a minor, subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:14-3 (Criminal Sexual Contact); if the victim is a minor and the offender is not the parent of the victim, N.J.S.2C:13-2 (Criminal Restraint) or N.J.S.2C:13-3 (False Imprisonment); N.J.S.2C:15-1 (Robbery), if convicted as a crime of the first degree; N.J.S.2C:17-1 (Arson and Related Offenses); paragraph (1) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Endangering the welfare of a child by engaging in sexual conduct which would impair or debauch the morals of the child, or causing the child other harm); paragraph (4) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Photographing or filming a child in a prohibited sexual act or for portrayal in a sexually suggestive manner); paragraph (3) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Causing or permitting a child to engage in a prohibited sexual act or the simulation of an act, or to be portrayed in a sexually suggestive manner); subparagraph (a) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Distributing, possessing with intent to distribute or using a file-sharing program to store items depicting the sexual exploitation or abuse of a child); subparagraph (b) of paragraph (5) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:24-4 (Possessing or viewing items depicting the sexual exploitation or abuse of a child); section 8 of P.L.2017, c.141 (C.2C:24-4.1) (Leader of a child pornography network); N.J.S.2C:28-1 (Perjury); N.J.S.2C:28-2 (False Swearing); paragraph (4) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:34-1 (Knowingly promoting the prostitution of the actor's child); section 2 of P.L.2002, c.26 (C.2C:38-2) (Terrorism); subsection a. of section 3 of P.L.2002, c.26 (C.2C:38-3) (Producing or Possessing Chemical Weapons, Biological Agents or Nuclear or Radiological Devices); and conspiracies or attempts to commit such crimes. Records of conviction for any crime committed by a person holding any public office, position or employment, elective or appointive, under the government of this State or any agency or political subdivision thereof and any conspiracy or attempt to commit such a crime shall not be subject to expungement if the crime involved or touched such office, position or employment. c.    In the case of conviction for the sale or distribution of a controlled dangerous substance or possession thereof with intent to sell, expungement shall be denied except where the crimes involve: (1)  Marijuana, where the total quantity sold, distributed or possessed with intent to sell was less than one ounce; (2)  Hashish, where the total quantity sold, distributed or possessed with intent to sell was less than five grams; or (3)  Any controlled dangerous substance provided that the conviction is of the third or fourth degree, or a conviction pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1997, c.327 (C.2C:35:7.1), where the court finds that compelling circumstances exist to grant the expungement. The prosecutor may object pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), N.J.S.2C:52-11, N.J.S.2C:52-14, or N.J.S.2C:52-24. d.    In the case of a State licensed physician or podiatrist convicted of an offense involving drugs or alcohol or pursuant to section 14 or 15 of P.L.1989, c.300 (C.2C:21-20 or 2C:21-4.1), the petitioner shall notify the State Board of Medical Examiners upon filing an application for expungement and provide the board with a copy thereof.  The petitioner shall also provide to the court a certification attesting that the requirements of this subsection were satisfied.  Failure to satisfy the requirements of this subsection shall be grounds for denial of the expungement application and, if applicable, administrative discipline by the board. e. If the person has any adjudications of juvenile delinquency that may be expunged pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1980, c.163 (C.2C:52-4.1), the person may include such adjudications in the application filed pursuant to this section.  If the person has any outstanding court-ordered financial assessments arising from an adjudication of juvenile delinquency, the provisions set forth in subsection a. of this section concerning court-ordered financial assessments shall apply. f. If the person has any municipal ordinance convictions or violations that may be expunged pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-4, the person may include such convictions or violations in the application filed pursuant to this section.  If the person has any outstanding court-ordered financial assessments arising from a municipal ordinance conviction or violation, the provisions set forth in subsection a. of this section concerning court-ordered financial assessments shall apply. (cf.: P.L.2023, c.260, s.1) 3.  N.J.S.2C:52-3 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-3.     Disorderly persons offenses and petty disorderly persons offenses. a. (1) Any person who has been convicted of one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State who has not been convicted of any crime [, whether within] under the laws of this State [or any other jurisdiction,] may present an expungement application to a court pursuant to this section.  If the person has any adjudications of juvenile delinquency that may be expunged pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1980, c.163 (C.2C:52-4.1), the person may include such adjudications in the application filed pursuant to this section. (2) Any person who has been convicted of one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State who has also been convicted of one or more crimes shall not be eligible to apply for an expungement pursuant to this section, but may present an expungement application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions were adjudged, pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-2. b.    Any person who has been convicted of one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State who has not been convicted of any crime [, whether within] under the laws of this State [or any other jurisdiction,] may present an expungement application pursuant to this section to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions were adjudged if: the person has been convicted, under the laws of this State, on the same or separate occasions of no more than five disorderly persons offenses, no more than five petty disorderly persons offenses, or a combination of no more than five disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses, and the person does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for a disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offense [, whether within] under the laws of this State [or any other jurisdiction], such that the total number of convictions for disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses would exceed five.  Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another disorderly persons offense or petty disorderly persons offense shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions and the juvenile delinquency adjudications that are the subject of the application, which may include convictions for no more than five disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses, or combination thereof; or the person has been convicted of multiple disorderly persons offenses or multiple petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, or a combination of multiple disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, which convictions were entered on the same day, and does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another offense under the laws of this State in addition to those convictions included in the expungement application [, whether any such conviction was within this State or any other jurisdiction].  Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offense that was not entered on the same day shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions entered on the same day and the juvenile delinquency adjudications that are the subject of the application; or the person has been convicted of multiple disorderly persons offenses or multiple petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, or a combination of multiple disorderly persons and petty disorderly persons offenses under the laws of this State, which offenses or combination of offenses were interdependent or closely related in circumstances and were committed as part of a sequence of events that took place within a comparatively short period of time, regardless of the date of conviction or sentencing for each individual offense, and the person does not otherwise have any subsequent conviction for another offense under the laws of this State in addition to those convictions included in the expungement application [, whether within this State or any other jurisdiction].  Subject to the provision of subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 requiring denial of an expungement petition when a person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged, a prior conviction for another disorderly persons offense or petty disorderly persons offense that was not interdependent or closely related in circumstances and was not committed within a comparatively short period of time as described above shall not bar presenting an application seeking expungement relief for the convictions of offenses that were interdependent or closely related and committed within a comparatively short period of time, and the juvenile delinquency adjudications that are the subject of the application. For purposes of determining eligibility to present an expungement application to the court pursuant to this section, a conviction for unlawful distribution of, or possessing or having under control with intent to distribute, marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (11) of subsection b. of N.J.S.2C:35-5, or a lesser amount of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (12) of subsection b. of that section, or a violation of either of those paragraphs and a violation of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1987, c.101 (C.2C:35-7) or subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.1997, c.327 (C.2C:35-7.1), for distributing, or possessing or having under control with intent to distribute, on or within 1,000 feet of any school property, or on or within 500 feet of the real property comprising a public housing facility, public park, or public building, or for obtaining or possessing marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (3) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, [or for an equivalent crime in another jurisdiction,] regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction of a crime within this State [or any other jurisdiction] but shall instead be considered a conviction of a disorderly persons offense within this State [or an equivalent category of offense within the other jurisdiction], and a conviction for obtaining, possessing, using, being under the influence of, or failing to make lawful disposition of marijuana or hashish in violation of paragraph (4) of subsection a., or subsection b., or subsection c. of N.J.S.2C:35-10, or a violation involving marijuana or hashish as described herein and using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia with that marijuana or hashish in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-2, [or for an equivalent crime or offense in another jurisdiction,] regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction within this State [or any other jurisdiction]. Additionally, for purposes of determining eligibility to present an expungement application to the court pursuant to this section, a conviction for unlawful distribution or dispensing of, possession with intent to distribute or dispense, or manufacture with intent to distribute or dispense, drug paraphernalia in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-3 when the paraphernalia is a hypodermic syringe or needle, [or for an equivalent crime involving a hypodermic syringe or needle in another jurisdiction,] regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction of a crime within this State [or any other jurisdiction] but shall instead be considered a conviction of a disorderly persons offense within this State [or an equivalent category of offense within the other jurisdiction], and a conviction for using or possessing with intent to use drug paraphernalia in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-2 when the paraphernalia is a hypodermic syringe or needle, or possession with intent to use or to distribute a hypodermic syringe or needle in violation of N.J.S.2C:36-6, [of for an equivalent crime or offense in another jurisdiction,] regardless of when the conviction occurred, shall not be considered a conviction within this State [or any other jurisdiction]. The person, if eligible, may present the expungement application after the expiration of a period of five years from the date of [his] the persons most recent conviction, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later.  The term court-ordered financial assessment as used herein and throughout this section means and includes any fine, fee, penalty, restitution, and other form of financial assessment imposed by the court as part of the sentence for the conviction or convictions or juvenile delinquency adjudications that are the subject of the application, for which payment of restitution takes precedence in accordance with chapter 46 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes.  The person shall submit the expungement application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions or juvenile delinquency adjudications were adjudged, which includes a duly verified petition as provided in N.J.S.2C:52-7 praying that the conviction, or convictions or juvenile delinquency adjudications if applicable, and all records and information pertaining thereto be expunged.  The petition appended to an application shall comply with the requirements of N.J.S.2C:52-1 et seq. Notwithstanding the provisions of the five-year time requirement, if, at the time of application, a court-ordered financial assessment subject to collection under the comprehensive enforcement program established pursuant to P.L.1995, c.9 (C.2B:19-1 et al.) is not yet satisfied due to reasons other than willful noncompliance, but the time requirement of five years is otherwise satisfied, the person may submit the expungement application and the court may grant an expungement; provided, however, that the court shall enter a civil judgment for the unpaid portion of the court-ordered financial assessment in the name of the Treasurer, State of New Jersey and transfer collections and disbursement responsibility to the State Treasurer for the outstanding amount in accordance with section 8 of P.L.2017, c.244 (C.2C:52-23.1).  The Treasurer may specify, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall collaborate with, the technical and informational standards required to effectuate the transfer of the collection and disbursement responsibilities.  Notwithstanding any provision in this law or any other law to the contrary, the court shall have sole discretion to amend the judgment. Additionally, an application may be filed and presented, and the court may grant an expungement pursuant to this section, although less than five years have expired in accordance with the time requirements when the court finds: (1)  the court-ordered financial assessment is satisfied but less than five years have expired from the date of satisfaction, the five-year time requirement is otherwise satisfied, and the court finds that the person substantially complied with any payment plan ordered pursuant to N.J.S.2C:46-1 et seq. or could not do so due to compelling circumstances affecting his ability to satisfy the assessment; or (2)  at least three but less than five years have expired from the date of the most recent conviction or juvenile delinquency adjudication, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later; and the person has not been otherwise convicted of a crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense since the time of the most recent conviction; and the court finds in its discretion that compelling circumstances exist to grant the expungement. The prosecutor may object pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), N.J.S.2C:52-11, N.J.S.2C:52-14, or N.J.S.2C:52-24. In determining whether compelling circumstances exist for the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a court may consider any relevant information provided by the person submitting the application and the prosecutor, including the amount of any court-ordered financial assessment imposed, the persons age at the time of the offense or offenses, the persons financial condition, and other relevant circumstances regarding the persons ability to pay.  However, regarding a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection or a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to any other part of this section, the person shall not be required to provide transcripts of plea or sentencing proceedings or be required to provide any presentence reports with the application or any other filing. c. If the person has any municipal ordinance convictions or violations that may be expunged pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-4, the person may include such convictions or violations in the application filed pursuant to this section.  If the person has any outstanding court-ordered financial assessments arising from a municipal ordinance conviction or violation, the provisions set forth in subsection b. of this section concerning court-ordered financial assessments shall apply. (cf.:P.L.2023, c.260, s.2) 4.  N.J.S.2C:52-4 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-4. Ordinances. a. In all cases wherein a person has been found guilty of violating a municipal ordinance of any governmental entity of this State [and who has not been convicted of any prior or subsequent crime, whether within this State or any other jurisdiction, and who has not been adjudged a disorderly person or petty disorderly person on more than two occasions], the person may, after the expiration of a period of 2 years from the date of [his] the persons conviction, payment of [fine] court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or release from incarceration, whichever is later, present a duly verified petition as provided in section 2C:52-7 herein to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions were adjudged praying that such conviction and all records and information pertaining thereto be expunged.  If the person has any adjudications of juvenile delinquency that may be expunged pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1980, c.163 (C.2C:52-4.1), the person may include such adjudications in the petition filed pursuant to this section. b. The person, if eligible, may present the expungement application after the expiration of a period of two years from the date of the persons most recent conviction, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later.  The term court-ordered financial assessment as used herein and throughout this section means any fine, fee, penalty, restitution, and other form of financial assessment imposed by the court as part of the sentence for the conviction or convictions that are the subject of the application, for which payment of restitution takes precedence in accordance with chapter 46 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes.  Notwithstanding the provisions concerning the two-year time requirement, if, at the time of application, a court-ordered financial assessment subject to collection under the comprehensive enforcement program established pursuant to P.L.1995, c.9 (C.2B:19-1 et al.) is not yet satisfied due to reasons other than willful noncompliance, but the time requirement of two years is otherwise satisfied, the person may submit the expungement application and the court may grant an expungement; provided, however, that if expungement is granted the court shall enter a civil judgment for the unpaid portion of the court-ordered financial assessment in the name of the Treasurer, State of New Jersey and transfer collections and disbursement responsibility to the State Treasurer for the outstanding amount in accordance with section 8 of P.L.2017, c.244 (C.2C:52-23.1).  The Treasurer may specify, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall collaborate with, the technical and informational standards required to effectuate the transfer of the collection and disbursement responsibilities.  Notwithstanding any provision in this law or any other law to the contrary, the court shall have sole discretion to amend the judgment. Additionally, an application may be filed and presented, and the court may grant an expungement pursuant to this section, although less than two years have expired in accordance with the time requirements when the court finds: (1)  the court-ordered financial assessment is satisfied but less than two years have expired from the date of satisfaction, the time requirement of two years is otherwise satisfied, and the court finds that the person substantially complied with any payment plan ordered pursuant to N.J.S.2C:46-1 et seq. or could not do so due to compelling circumstances affecting his ability to satisfy the assessment; or (2)  at least one but less than two years have expired from the date of the most recent conviction, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later; and the person has not been otherwise convicted of a crime, disorderly persons offense, or petty disorderly persons offense since the time of the most recent conviction; and the court finds in its discretion that compelling circumstances exist to grant the expungement. The prosecutor may object pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), N.J.S.2C:52-11, N.J.S.2C:52-14, or N.J.S.2C:52-24. In determining whether compelling circumstances exist for the purposes of paragraph (1) of this subsection, a court may consider any relevant information provided by the person submitting the application and the prosecutor, including the amount of any court-ordered financial assessment imposed, the persons age at the time of the offense or offenses, the persons financial condition, and other relevant circumstances regarding the persons ability to pay.  However, regarding a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection or a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to any other part of this section, the person shall not be required to provide transcripts of plea or sentencing proceedings or be required to provide any presentence reports with the application or any other filing. (cf: P.L.2023, c.260, s.4) 5.  Section 1 of P.L.1980, c.163 (C.2C:52-4.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  Any person adjudged a juvenile delinquent may have such adjudication expunged as follows: (1)  Pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-2, if the act committed by the juvenile would have constituted a crime if committed by an adult; (2)  Pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-3, if the act committed by the juvenile would have constituted a disorderly or petty disorderly persons offense if committed by an adult; or (3)  Pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-4, if the act committed by the juvenile would have constituted an ordinance violation if committed by an adult. For purposes of expungement, any act which resulted in a juvenile being adjudged a delinquent shall be classified as if that act had been committed by an adult. b.    Additionally, any person who has been adjudged a juvenile delinquent may have his entire record of delinquency adjudications expunged, by application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons adjudications were adjudged, which includes a duly verified petition as provided in N.J.S.2C:52-7, if: (1)  Three years have elapsed since the final discharge of the person from legal custody or supervision or three years have elapsed after the entry of any other court order not involving custody or supervision, except that periods of post-incarceration supervision pursuant to section 25 of P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-44), shall not be considered in calculating the three-year period for purposes of this paragraph; and (2)  [He] The person has not been convicted of a crime, or a disorderly or petty disorderly persons offense, or adjudged a delinquent, or in need of supervision, during the three years prior to the filing of the petition, and no proceeding or complaint is pending seeking such a conviction or adjudication, except that periods of post-incarceration supervision pursuant to section 25 of P.L.1982, c.77 (C.2A:4A-44), shall not be considered in calculating the three-year period for purposes of this paragraph; and (3)  [He was never adjudged a juvenile delinquent on the basis of an act which if committed by an adult would constitute a crime not subject to expungement under N.J.S.2C:52-2;] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.     , c.      (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill)). (4)  [He has never had an adult conviction expunged; and] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.     , c.      (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill)). (5)  [He has never had adult criminal charges dismissed following completion of a supervisory treatment or other diversion program] (Deleted by amendment, P.L.     , c.      (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill)). (6) Three years have elapsed since the persons payment of any court-ordered financial assessment. The term court-ordered financial assessment as used herein and throughout this subsection means any fine, fee, penalty, restitution, and other form of financial assessment imposed by the court as part of the sentence for the adjudications that are the subject of the application, for which payment of restitution takes precedence in accordance with chapter 46 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes.          Notwithstanding the provisions concerning the three-year time requirement, if, at the time of application, a court-ordered financial assessment subject to collection under the comprehensive enforcement program established pursuant to P.L.1995, c.9 (C.2B:19-1 et al.) is not yet satisfied due to reasons other than willful noncompliance, but the time requirement of three years is otherwise satisfied, the person may submit the expungement application and the court may grant an expungement; provided, however, that if expungement is granted the court shall enter a civil judgment for the unpaid portion of the court-ordered financial assessment in the name of the Treasurer, State of New Jersey and transfer collections and disbursement responsibility to the State Treasurer for the outstanding amount in accordance with section 8 of P.L.2017, c.244 (C.2C:52-23.1).  The Treasurer may specify, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall collaborate with, the technical and informational standards required to effectuate the transfer of the collection and disbursement responsibilities.  Notwithstanding any provision in this law or any other law to the contrary, the court shall have sole discretion to amend the judgment. Additionally, an application may be filed and presented, and the court may grant an expungement pursuant to this subsection, although less than three years have expired in accordance with the time requirements when the court finds: (a)   the court-ordered financial assessment is satisfied but less than three years have expired from the date of satisfaction, the time requirement of three years is otherwise satisfied, and the court finds that the person substantially complied with any payment plan ordered pursuant to N.J.S.2C:46-1 et seq. or could not do so due to compelling circumstances affecting his ability to satisfy the assessment; or (b)  at least two but less than three years have expired from the date of the most recent adjudication, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later; and the person has not been otherwise adjudicated delinquent since the time of the most recent adjudication; and the court finds in its discretion that compelling circumstances exist to grant the expungement.  The prosecutor may object pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), N.J.S.2C:52-11, N.J.S.2C:52-14, or N.J.S.2C:52-24. In determining whether compelling circumstances exist for the purposes of subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, a court may consider any relevant information provided by the person submitting the application and the prosecutor, including the amount of any court-ordered financial assessment imposed, the persons age at the time of the offense or offenses, the persons financial condition, and other relevant circumstances regarding the persons ability to pay.  However, regarding a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to subparagraph (a) of this paragraph or a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to any other part of this section, the person shall not be required to provide transcripts of plea or sentencing proceedings or be required to provide any presentence reports with the application or any other filing. c.    Any person who has been charged with an act of delinquency and against whom proceedings were dismissed may have the filing of those charges expunged pursuant to the provisions of N.J.S.2C:52-6. (cf: P.L.2017, c.245, s.1) 6.  Section 7 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-5.3) is amended to read as follows: 7.    Clean slate expungement by petition. a. A person, who is not otherwise eligible to present an expungement application pursuant to any other section of chapter 52 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes or other section of law, may present an expungement application to the Superior Court pursuant to this section if the person has been convicted of one or more crimes, one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses, one or more municipal violations, one or more adjudications of juvenile delinquency, or a combination of one or more crimes, offenses, juvenile adjudications, or violations under the laws of this State [, unless the person has a conviction for a crime which is not subject to expungement pursuant to subsection b. or c. of N.J.S.2C:52-2].  A conviction for a crime which is not subject to expungement pursuant to subsection b. or c. of N.J.S.2C:52-2 shall not be expunged pursuant to this section, but the person shall be eligible to expunge any other offenses that are not barred from expungement.  The person may present an application pursuant to this section regardless of whether the person would otherwise be ineligible pursuant to subsection e. of N.J.S.2C:52-14 for having had a previous criminal conviction expunged, or due to having been granted an expungement pursuant to this or any other provision of law. b.    The person, if eligible, may present the expungement application after the expiration of a period of [ten] seven years from the date of the persons most recent conviction or juvenile adjudication, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later.  The term court-ordered financial assessment as used herein and throughout this section means and includes any fine, fee, penalty, restitution, and other form of financial assessment imposed by the court as part of the sentence for the conviction or convictions or juvenile adjudications that are the subject of the application, for which payment of restitution takes precedence in accordance with chapter 46 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes.  The person shall submit the expungement application to the Superior Court in the county in which the person resides or a county in which one or more of the persons convictions or juvenile adjudications were adjudged, which includes a duly verified petition as provided in N.J.S.2C:52-7 praying that all the persons convictions or juvenile adjudications, and all records and information pertaining thereto, be expunged.  The petition appended to an application shall comply with the requirements set forth in N.J.S.2C:52-1 et seq. c. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions concerning the [ten] seven-year time requirement, if, at the time of application, a court-ordered financial assessment subject to collection under the comprehensive enforcement program established pursuant to P.L.1995, c.9 (C.2B:19-1 et al.) is not yet satisfied due to reasons other than willful noncompliance, but the time requirement of [ten] seven years is otherwise satisfied, the person may submit the expungement application and the court shall grant an expungement in accordance with this section; provided, however, that at the time of the expungement the court shall enter a civil judgment for the unpaid portion of the court-ordered financial assessment in the name of the Treasurer, State of New Jersey and transfer collection and disbursement responsibility to the State Treasurer for the outstanding amount in accordance with section 8 of P.L.2017, c.244 (C.2C:52-23.1).  The Treasurer may specify, and the Administrative Office of the Courts shall collaborate with, the technical and informational standards required to effectuate the transfer of the collection and disbursement responsibilities.  Notwithstanding any provision in this law or any other law to the contrary, the court shall have sole discretion to amend the judgment. (2) Additionally, an application may be filed and presented, and the court shall grant an expungement pursuant to this section, although less than [ten] seven years have expired in accordance with the time requirements when the court finds that the court-ordered financial assessment is satisfied but less than [ten] seven years have expired from the date of satisfaction, the [ten] seven-year time requirement is otherwise satisfied, and the court finds that the person substantially complied with any payment plan ordered pursuant to N.J.S.2C:46-1 et seq. or could not do so due to compelling circumstances affecting the persons ability to satisfy the assessment.  In determining whether compelling circumstances exist for the purposes of this paragraph, a court may consider any relevant information provided by the person submitting the application and the prosecutor, including the amount of any court-ordered financial assessment imposed, the persons age at the time of the offense or offenses, the persons financial condition, and other relevant circumstances regarding the persons ability to pay.  However, regarding a determination of compelling circumstances pursuant to this paragraph, the person shall not be required to provide transcripts of plea or sentencing proceedings or be required to provide any presentence reports with the application or any other filing. d.    No expungement applications may be filed pursuant to this section after the establishment of the automated clean slate process pursuant to subsection a. of section 8 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-5.4). (cf: P.L.2023, c.260, s.3) 7.  Section 8 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-5.4) is amended to read as follows: 8.    Automated clean slate process. a. (1) The State shall develop and implement an automated process, based, to the greatest extent practicable, on the recommendations of the task force established pursuant to subsection b. of this section, by which all convictions, municipal ordinance violations, and adjudications of juvenile delinquency, and all records and information pertaining thereto, shall be rendered inaccessible to the public, through sealing, expungement, or some equivalent process, for any person who has been convicted of one or more crimes, one or more disorderly persons or petty disorderly persons offenses, one or more ordinance violations, one or more juvenile adjudications, or a combination of one or more crimes, violations, adjudications, and offenses under the laws of this State, [unless the person has a] except for those convictions for [a] crimes which [is] are not subject to expungement pursuant to subsection b. or c. of N.J.S.2C:52-2, upon the expiration of a period of [ten] seven years from the date of the persons most recent conviction or juvenile adjudication, payment of any court-ordered financial assessment, satisfactory completion of probation or parole, or release from incarceration, whichever is later.  The term court-ordered financial assessment as used herein means and includes any fine, fee, penalty, restitution, and other form of financial assessment imposed by the court as part of the sentence for the conviction or convictions that are subject to being rendered inaccessible to the public, for which payment of restitution takes precedence in accordance with chapter 46 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes. (2)  The automated process shall be designed to restore a persons convictions and other information contained in the persons criminal history record information files if the person is subsequently convicted of a crime, for which the conviction is not subject to expungement pursuant to subsection b. or c. of N.J.S.2C:52-2.  A prosecutor may submit the restored criminal history record information to the court for consideration at sentencing for the subsequent conviction. (3)  Upon establishment of the automated process pursuant to this subsection, any pending clean slate expungement petitions filed pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-5.3) shall be rendered moot and shall be withdrawn or dismissed in accordance with procedures established by the Supreme Court. b. (1) (a) There is established a task force for the purpose of examining, evaluating, and making recommendations regarding the development and implementation of the automated process described in subsection a. of this section, by which all of a persons convictions, and all records and information pertaining thereto, shall be rendered inaccessible to the public. (b)  The task force shall consist of at least the following members: The Chief Technology Officer of the Office of Information Technology, or a designee or designees; The Attorney General, or a designee or designees, one or more of whom may be members of the State Bureau of Identification and the Information Technology Bureau in the Division of State Police designated by the Superintendent of the State Police; The Administrative Director of the Courts, or a designee or designees; The Director of Information Technology for the Administrative Office of the Courts, or a designee or designees; The Commissioner of the Department of Corrections, or a designee or designees; The President of the New Jersey County Jail Wardens Association, or a designee or designees; The President of the New Jersey State Association of Chiefs of Police, or a designee or designees; Two members of the Senate, who shall each be of different political parties, appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of the Senate President; Two members of the General Assembly, who shall each be of different political parties, appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the General Assembly; Two members of academic institutions or non-profit entities appointed by the Governor who each have a background in, or special knowledge of, computer technology, database management, or recordkeeping processes; and Four members of the public appointed by the Governor who each have a background in, or special knowledge of, the technological, criminal record or legal processes of expungement, or criminal history recordkeeping, of which two of whom shall be appointed by the Governor upon recommendation of the Senate President and two of whom shall be appointed by the Governor upon recommendation of the Speaker of the General Assembly. (c)   Appointments to the task force shall be made within 30 days of the effective date of this section. Vacancies in the membership of the task force shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments were made. (d)  Members of the task force shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenditures incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the task force within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the task force for its purposes. (e)   The task force shall organize as soon as practicable, but no later than 30 days following the appointment of its members.  The task force shall choose a chairperson from among its members and shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the task force. (f)   The Department of Law and Public Safety shall provide such stenographic, clerical, and other administrative assistants, and such professional staff as the task force requires to carry out its work.  The task force shall also be entitled to call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of the employees of any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency as it may require and as may be available for its purposes. (2)  It shall be the duty of the task force to identify, analyze and recommend solutions to any technological, fiscal, resource, and practical issues that may arise in the development and implementation of the automated process described in subsection a. of this section.  In carrying out these responsibilities, the task force shall to the extent feasible: (a)   examine and evaluate the effectiveness of the design and implementation of automated processes in Pennsylvania and California and other jurisdictions that have implemented similar programs, and consult with officials in those jurisdictions concerning their processes and any technological, fiscal, resource, and practical issues that they may have encountered, contemplated, or addressed in developing and implementing those systems; and (b)  consult with non-profit computer programming organizations such as Code for America with expertise in assisting in the implementation of automated processes and expungement processing generally, to the extent those organizations make themselves available for this purpose; and (c)   identify the necessary systemic changes, required technology, cost estimates, and possible sources of funding for developing and implementing the automated process described in subsection a. of this section. (3) (a) The task force shall issue a final report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), no later than 180 days after the task force organizes. (b)  The task force shall expire 30 days after the issuance of its report. (4) Notwithstanding subparagraph (b) of paragraph (3) of this subsection, the task force shall be reconstituted and reconvened as otherwise set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) and subparagraph (a) of paragraph (3) of this subsection upon the enactment of P.L. , c.      (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) for the purpose of providing updated findings and recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature in light of changes and developments in expungement laws and procedures, including, but not limited to, the implementation of the electronic filing system established pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1), and the automated process established pursuant to subsection a. of this section. In addition to the membership set forth in subparagraph (b) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the task force shall also include the following members: The Director of the Juvenile Justice Commission within the Department of Law and Public Safety, or a designee or designees; The President of the County Prosecutors Association of New Jersey, or a designee or designees; The Public Defender, or a designee or designees; The President of Legal Services of New Jersey, or a designee or designees; The President of the Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers of New Jersey, or a designee or designees; and Two members who shall be New Jersey attorneys-at-law in good standing appointed by the President of the New Jersey State Bar Association who each have a background in, or special knowledge of, the practice of criminal defense, post-conviction relief, or expungement law. (cf: P.L.2019, c.269, s.8) 8.  N.J.S.2C:52-7 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-7. Petition for expungement. Every petition for expungement filed pursuant to this chapter shall be filed in the Superior Court in the county in which the petitioner resides or a county in which one or more of the petitioners matters were disposed of, and shall be verified and include: a.    Petitioners date of birth. b.    Petitioners date of arrest. c.    The statute or statutes and offense or offenses for which petitioner was arrested and of which petitioner was convicted or adjudicated delinquent. d.    The original indictment, summons, or complaint number. e.    Petitioners date of conviction or adjudication of delinquency, or date of disposition of the matter if no conviction or adjudication of delinquency resulted. f.     The courts disposition of the matter and the punishment imposed, if any. (cf: P.L.2023, c.260, s.8) 9. Section 11 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-10.1) is amended to read as follows: 11. a. (1) No later than twelve months after the effective date of this section, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop and maintain a system for petitioners to electronically file expungement applications pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-1 et seq. The e-filing system shall be available Statewide and include electronic filing, electronic service of process, and electronic document management. (2)  The system shall, in accordance with N.J.S.2C:52-10, electronically notify and serve copies of the petition and all supporting documents upon the Superintendent of State Police, the Attorney General, and each county prosecutor as described in that section. (3)  The system shall electronically compile a listing of all possibly relevant Judiciary records for an expungement petitioner and transmit this information to all parties served with copies of the petition and all supporting documents in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection. b.    Upon receipt of the information from the court pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection a. of this section, the Superintendent of State Police, the Attorney General, and the county prosecutor of any county in which the person was convicted shall, within 60 days, review and confirm, as appropriate, the information against the persons criminal history record information files. [and]  Any party reviewing this information shall promptly notify the court and the petitioner of any inaccurate or incomplete data contained in the information files, [or] and if a party has in its possession the correct or missing data, that party shall promptly provide the correct or missing data to the court and the petitioner.  Any party reviewing this information shall also promptly notify the court and the petitioner of any other basis for ineligibility, if applicable, pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-14. c.    The court shall provide copies of an expungement order to the person who is the subject of the petition and electronically transmit the order to the law enforcement and criminal justice agencies which, at the time of the hearing on the petition, possess any records specified in the order in accordance with N.J.S.2C:52-15. (cf: P.L.2019, c.269, s.11) 10.  N.J.S.2C:52-14 is amended to read as follows: 2C:52-14.   A petition for expungement filed pursuant to this chapter shall be denied when: a.    Any statutory prerequisite, including any provision of this chapter, is not fulfilled or there is any other statutory basis for denying relief. b.    The need for the availability of the records outweighs the desirability of having a person freed from any disabilities as otherwise provided in this chapter.  An application may be denied under this subsection only following objection of a party given notice pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-10 and the burden of asserting such grounds shall be on the objector. c.    In connection with a petition under N.J.S.2C:52-6, the acquittal, discharge or dismissal of charges resulted from a plea bargaining agreement involving the conviction of other charges.  This bar, however, shall not apply once the conviction is itself expunged. d.    The arrest or conviction sought to be expunged is, at the time of hearing, the subject matter of civil litigation between the petitioner or his legal representative and the State, any governmental entity thereof or any State agency and the representatives or employees of any such body. e.    Except as set forth in subsection a. of section 7 of P.L.2019, c.269 (C.2C:52-5.3) concerning a clean slate expungement petition, the person has had a previous criminal conviction expunged regardless of the lapse of time between the prior expungement, or sealing under prior law, and the present petition.  This provision shall not apply: (1)  When the person is seeking the expungement of a municipal ordinance violation, (2)  When the person is seeking the expungement of records pursuant to N.J.S.2C:52-6, [or] (3)  When the person is seeking the expungement of records of conviction for possession with intent to use drug paraphernalia pursuant to N.J.S.2C:36-2, when same is a hypodermic syringe or needle; possession with the intent to distribute drug paraphernalia pursuant to N.J.S.2C:36-3, when same is a hypodermic syringe or needle; or possession or distribution of hypodermic syringe or needle pursuant to N.J.S.2C:36-6, or (4) When the person is seeking the expungement of adjudications of juvenile delinquency. f.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2017, c.244) (cf: P.L.2021, c.403, s.2) 11. This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment, but the Attorney General and the Administrative Director of the Courts may take such anticipatory action as may be necessary for the timely implementation of this act.